District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as "Furthering Admissions Inclusion and Representation (FAIR) Act of 2025".
TITLE I. DONOR AND LEGACY PREFERENCES IN HIGHER EDUCATION
ADMISSIONS.
Sec. 101. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) "Donor preference in admissions" means considering an applicant's relation to
a donor of, or a donation to, the higher education institution as a factor in the admissions process,
including asking an applicant to indicate their family's donor status and including that information
among the documents that the higher education institution uses to consider an applicant for
admission.

(2) “Higher Education Institution” means a college or university located in the
District of Columbia providing higher education leading to the award of a diploma, degree, or the
equivalent thereof.
(3)(A) “Legacy preference in admissions” means considering an applicant’s
relation to an alumni of the higher education institution as a factor in the admissions process,
including asking an applicant to indicate where their relatives attended college and including that
information among the documents that the higher education institution uses to consider an
applicant for admission.
(B) “Legacy preference in admissions” does not include collecting data on
an applicant’s relation to an alumni or donors for purposes other than admissions decisions.
(4) “Local education agency” means the District of Columbia Public Schools
system or any individual or group of public charter schools operating under a single charter.
Sec. 102. Limitations on Higher Education Institutions with Legacy and Donor
Preferences in Admissions.
(a) Higher education institutions that offer a legacy or donor preference in admissions
shall be prohibited from being any entities as described in subsection (d) of this section, except
in scenarios as provided in subsection (b) of this section.
(b)(1) The higher education institution may waive such admission limits, as described in
section (4)(a) of this section, for applicants who are descendants of people enslaved for the
benefit of that higher education institution if the higher education institution provides preferential
treatment in the admission process for those applicants who are actual descendants of people
enslaved for the benefit of that higher education institution.


(2)(A) A higher education institution shall be exempt from the provisions of this
section if it submits records to the Mayor documenting that 30% of the institution’s student body
receives Federal Pell Grants.
(B) The Mayor shall create a process for an institution to submit records
documenting that it has met the requirements of sub-paragraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) The Mayor shall not issue or reissue a license or permit or award a government-
assisted project, contract, or grant requested by a higher education institution if the applicant
administers a legacy or donor preference in admissions.
(d) Higher education institutions that offer legacy or donor preferences in admission are
prohibited from being the following entities:
(1) The signatory to a contract or grant executed by the Mayor which involves any
District of Columbia government funds, or funds which, in accordance with a federal grant or
otherwise, the District government administers; and
(2) A recipient of a District government economic development action including
contracts, grants, loans, tax abatements, land transfers for redevelopment, or tax increment
financing that results in a financial benefit from an agency, commission, instrumentality, or other
entity of the District government.
TITLE II. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.
Sec. 201. Section 202(b-1) of the Department of Education Establishment Act of 2007,
effective June 12, 2007 (D.C. Law 17-9; D.C. Official Code § 38-191), is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (3)(A) is amended by adding a new subsection (vi) to read as
follows:


“(vi) Data on where students graduated from high school and their home
jurisdiction.”.
(2) A new subsection (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4)(A) Higher education institutions in the District shall submit, on an annual
basis to the Deputy Mayor for Education for the purposes of including in a centralized data
system, a report disaggregated by race or ethnicity, gender or non-binary from the previous five
academic years that includes the following information:
“(i) The number of first-time, full-time District residents who
applied, were admitted, enrolled, recipient of a Federal Pell Grant, recipient of a subsidized
Stafford loan who did not receive a Pell grant, received neither a Pell Grant or a subsidized
Stafford Loan, first generation, enrolled with credits, program of study, received remedial
academic supports, and received a certificate, diploma, degree, or the equivalent thereof within
five years;
“(ii) The number of first-time, full-time graduates from a local
education agency that applied, were admitted, enrolled, recipient of a Federal Pell Grant,
recipient of a subsidized Stafford loan who did not receive a Pell grant, received neither a Pell
Grant or a subsidized Stafford Loan, first generation, enrolled with credits, program of study,
received remedial academic supports, and received a certificate, diploma, degree, or the
equivalent thereof within five years;
“(iii) The number of Pell Grant-eligible students who applied,
were admitted, and enrolled;


100 “(iv) The number of first-time, full-time District residents that
101 applied, were admitted, and enrolled; and
102 “(v) The number of first-time, full-time non-District residents that
103 applied, were admitted, and enrolled.”.
104 (B) Data in the report submitted pursuant to clause (i) shall only be
105 publicly provided in the aggregate and in a manner that prevents the identification of any
106 individual.
107 (3) A new subsection (5) is added to read as follows:
108 “(5) Higher education institutions in the District shall submit, on an annual basis,
109 to the Deputy Mayor for Education for the purposes of including in a centralized data system, a
110 report from the previous five academic years that includes the following information:
111 “(A) A list of high schools that the higher education institution recruits
112 from for admission as first-year students;
113 “(B) An accounting of the value of the institutions' tax exemption in the
114 District; and
115 “(C) A listing of all public contracts and grants the institution receives
116 from the District or Federal Governments.”.
117 TITLE III. APPLICABILITY; FISCAL IMPACT STATEMENT; EFFECTIVE DATE.
118 Sec. 301. Applicability.
119 This Act shall apply on the second occurrence of August 1 after the effective date of the
120 Act.
121 Sec. 302. Fiscal impact statement.


122 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
123 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
124 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
125 Sec. 303. Effective date.
126 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
127 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
128 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
129 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
130 Columbia Register.